Utah statutes.
59-10-1002.2.   Apportionment of tax credits.
(1)  A nonresident individual or a part-year resident individual that claims a
tax credit in accordance with Section 59-10-1017, 59-10-1018, 59-10-1019,
59-10-1021, 59-10-1022, 59-10-1023, or 59-10-1024, may only claim an
apportioned amount of the tax credit equal to:
(a)  for a nonresident individual, the product of:
(i)  the state income tax percentage for the nonresident individual; and
(ii)  the amount of the tax credit that the nonresident individual would have
been allowed to claim but for the apportionment requirements of this section;
or
(b)  for a part-year resident individual, the product of:
(i)  the state income tax percentage for the part-year resident individual;
and
(ii)  the amount of the tax credit that the part-year resident individual
would have been allowed to claim but for the apportionment requirements of
this section.
(2)  A nonresident estate or trust that claims a tax credit in accordance with
Section 59-10-1017, 59-10-1020, 59-10-1022, or 59-10-1024, may only claim an
apportioned amount of the tax credit equal to the product of:
(a)  the state income tax percentage for the nonresident estate or trust; and
(b)  the amount of the tax credit that the nonresident estate or trust would
have been allowed to claim but for the apportionment requirements of this
section.
